Illinois, session 104th, HB2444.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Attorney General Act is amended by adding 5Section 4f as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 205/4f new)7    Sec. 4f. Hours reporting. The Office of the Attorney 8General shall record the number of hours, legal fees, and 9costs incurred each fiscal year by its attorneys and any 10outside counsel acting on its behalf to defend the State in all 11legal proceedings relating to the constitutionality or 12statutory interpretation of Illinois law. On or before July 1, 132026, and each year thereafter, the Attorney General shall 14report the recorded number of hours, legal fees, and costs 15incurred annually to the General Assembly. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.